Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 3

Municipal Court Reform Act

16-18-301. Short title — Construction of terms.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Court Reform Act of 2004.”

As used in this part:

“Any law to the contrary” includes, but is not limited to, any conflicting provision of any general statute, local law, private act, charter provision, municipal law or municipal ordinance; and

“Municipal court” includes the city, town, mayor's, recorder's or municipal court, or other similarly functioning court, however designated, for any city, town, municipality or metropolitan government, whether the court exists pursuant to general statute, local law, private act, charter provision, municipal law, municipal ordinance or other legal authorization.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former § 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Comparative Legislation. Court reform:

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 476.015 et seq.

16-18-302. Jurisdiction of municipal courts.

For any municipality that does not have, on May 5, 2009, a municipal court that was ordained and established by the general assembly, a municipal court is created to be presided over by a city judge. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary:

A municipal court possesses jurisdiction in and over cases:

For violation of the laws and ordinances of the municipality; or

Arising under the laws and ordinances of the municipality; and

A municipal court also possesses jurisdiction to enforce any municipal law or ordinance that mirrors, substantially duplicates or incorporates by cross-reference the language of a state criminal statute, if and only if the state criminal statute mirrored, duplicated or cross-referenced is a Class C misdemeanor and the maximum penalty prescribed by municipal law or ordinance is a civil fine not in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00).

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(2) or any other law to the contrary, in any municipality having a population in excess of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, a municipal court also possesses jurisdiction to enforce any municipal law or ordinance that mirrors, substantially duplicates or incorporates by cross-reference the language of any of the following state criminal statutes relative to:

The offense of operating a motor vehicle without a valid driver license, § 55-50-301;

The Class B misdemeanor offense of reckless driving, § 55-10-205;

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage purchasing, possession, transportation or consumption of alcoholic beverages, wine or beer, § 1-3-113(b);

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage consumption, possession or transportation of beer or any intoxicating liquor, § 57-3-412(a)(3);

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage purchasing or attempting to purchase any alcoholic beverage, § 57-3-412(a)(5);

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage purchasing, attempting to purchase or possession of any alcoholic beverages, § 57-4-203(b)(2);

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage purchasing or attempting to purchase beer or alcoholic beverages, § 57-5-301(d); or

The Class A misdemeanor offenses of underage possession or transportation of beer, § 57-5-301(e).

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in addition to jurisdiction authorized pursuant to subsection (a) or (b), a municipal court may also exercise concurrent jurisdiction with the court of general sessions if, and only if:

The municipal court possessed and exercised such concurrent general sessions jurisdiction continuously on and before May 11, 2003; or

After May 12, 2003, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction is duly conferred upon the municipal court in accordance with the procedures and requirements set forth in § 16-18-311.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a municipal court may exercise no jurisdiction other than the jurisdiction authorized by this section; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to impair or in any way restrict the authority of a juvenile judge to waive jurisdiction over any cases or class of cases of alleged traffic violations, as authorized pursuant to § 37-1-146, or the authority of a municipal court to receive and dispose of such cases or classes of cases of alleged traffic violations.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2; 2006, ch. 1004, § 1; 2009, ch. 144, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former § 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the first sentence of the introductory paragraph of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 144, § 2. May 5, 2009.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A, B and C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Whether a private or public act may constitutionally authorize a city to establish an environmental court with injunctive powers and power to imprison, OAG 07-147 (10/19/07).

16-18-303. Administration of oaths.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, every popularly elected or appointed judge of a municipal court is authorized to administer oaths.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

16-18-304. Court costs as prescribed by municipal law or ordinance — Allocation of fees — Training and continuing education for judges and clerks — Fees when exercising concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, municipal court costs shall be set and collected in the amount prescribed by municipal law or ordinance. From such amount, one dollar ($1.00) shall be forwarded by the municipal court clerk to the state treasurer for deposit and shall be credited to the account for the administrative office of the courts (AOC) for the sole purpose of defraying the administrative director's expenses in providing training and continuing education courses for municipal court judges and municipal court clerks. The AOC shall allocate fifty percent (50%) of such funds exclusively for the purpose of providing training and continuing education for municipal court clerks. The AOC is authorized to contract with qualified persons, entities or organizations in order to provide required training or continuing education for municipal court judges. The AOC shall contract with the municipal technical advisory service of the University of Tennessee institute for public service in order to provide required training or continuing education for municipal court clerks and may contract with other qualified persons, entities or organizations to provide additional or alternate training to municipal court clerks.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the extent that a municipal court is exercising its duly conferred, concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction in a given case, this section does not apply and costs in such case shall be assessed, collected and distributed in the same manner as such costs are assessed, collected and distributed in the court of general sessions.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former § 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

16-18-305. Levy of state privilege tax on litigation — Collection — Liability for failure to collect or disburse tax — Tax when exercising concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding § 67-4-602, or any other law to the contrary, there is levied a state privilege tax on litigation of thirteen dollars and seventy-five cents ($13.75) in all cases in a municipal court. All taxes levied pursuant to this subsection (a) shall be collected in accordance with § 67-4-603 and shall be paid into the state treasury and allocated in accordance with § 67-4-606.

There is also levied a state privilege tax on litigation of one dollar ($1.00) for each and every violation of any municipal law or ordinance governing use of a public parking space. The tax is due and shall be collected even if the offender does not appear before the court. Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, the only litigation privilege tax collected for a violation of any municipal law or ordinance governing the use of a public parking space shall be the one dollar ($1.00) litigation tax levied by this subsection (b). The revenue generated by the privilege tax levied by this subsection (b) shall be apportioned in accordance with § 67-4-606.

Notwithstanding § 67-4-602, or any other law to the contrary, no other state privilege tax on litigation shall be levied or collected with respect to litigation in a municipal court; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to repeal existing authority for the levy of a municipal litigation tax, nor shall this section be construed to grant new authority for the levy of a municipal litigation tax.

Any state privilege tax imposed pursuant to this section that the clerk of the court fails to collect and pay over to the department of revenue shall be a debt of the clerk. Any clerk of the court failing or refusing to collect and pay over to the department state litigation taxes imposed pursuant to this section shall be liable for the taxes and the clerk's official bondsman shall also be liable for the taxes, and the commissioner or the commissioner's delegate may collect the amount of the tax from the clerk or the clerk's official bondsman pursuant to title 67, chapter 1, part 14.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, to the extent that a municipal court is exercising its duly conferred concurrent general sessions jurisdiction in a given case, this section does not apply and litigation taxes in the case shall be levied and collected in the same manner as taxes are levied and collected in the general sessions court.

For receiving and paying over all privilege taxes on litigation, the clerk of a municipal court is entitled to a commission of two percent (2%).

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2; 2005, ch. 429, §§ 20, 27.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Attorney General Opinions. For collecting and paying over litigation taxes on cases heard under the municipal court's concurrent general sessions jurisdiction, a municipal court clerk is entitled to receive a commission of 2%, OAG 06-147 (9/27/06).

16-18-306. Fine for contempt of municipal court.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, contempt of a municipal court shall be punishable by fine in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00), or such lesser amount as may be imposed in the judge's discretion.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city court to punish an individual for contempt of court when the person fails to appear in court for an appointed court date. OAG 11-17, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/15/11).

16-18-307. Appeal of municipal court judgment — Bond.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any person dissatisfied with the judgment of a municipal court, in any case or cases heard and determined by the court acting pursuant to § 16-18-302(a), may, within ten (10) days thereafter, Sundays exclusive, appeal to the circuit court of the county, upon giving bond in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the person's appearance and the faithful prosecution of the appeal. As used in this section, person includes, but is not limited to, a natural person, corporation, business entity or the municipality.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipal court clerk's obligation to transmit appeal bond to the circuit-court clerk. OAG 15-07, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/27/15).

16-18-308. Concurrent holding of any other office or employment.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a judge of a municipal court may not concurrently hold any other office or employment with the municipality. This section does not apply to any municipal official or employee who, on March 1, 2005, concurrently holds office as judge of the municipal court; provided, however, that if the official or employee either discontinues service as a municipal official or employee or discontinues service as judge of the municipal court, then the exemption granted by this section no longer applies.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) to the contrary, if a municipal charter provides that the person who serves as judge of the municipal court shall also serve as the recorder for the municipality, then the person may concurrently hold both offices.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2; 2009, ch. 505, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 505, § 4. June 25, 2009.

16-18-309. Training and continuing education.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a)(4), each calendar year, the judge of each municipal court must attend at least three (3) hours of training or continuing education courses provided by, through or with approval of the administrative office of the courts (AOC) and must certify attendance to the administrative director. The three (3) hours of training or continuing education required by this subsection (a) shall consist of material specifically designed for municipal court judges and for training the judges concerning the issues, procedures and new developments relevant to the judges. General legal training or continuing legal education shall not be sufficient to satisfy the requirement. If a municipal court judge fails to timely comply with such requirements, then the judge shall be extended a six (6) month grace period in order to achieve compliance; provided, however, that training obtained to satisfy requirements for the preceding calendar year shall not also be used to satisfy requirements for the current calendar year. The failure of the judge to achieve compliance prior to conclusion of the six (6) month grace period shall render all subsequent judgments of the judge null and void and of no effect, until such time as the requirements are met. The training and continuing education courses may be offered by the AOC in conjunction with the annual meeting of the Tennessee municipal judges’ conference held in accordance with § 17-3-301(c).

Each municipal judge shall be compensated and reimbursed for attending required training or continuing education in accordance with the travel policy of the municipality.

If a municipal court judge attends more than three (3) hours of qualifying training or continuing education in a calendar year, the hours in excess of three (3) hours may be carried over for one (1) calendar year.

If the judge of a municipal court is authorized to practice law in the courts of this state, and if the judge satisfies the annual continuing legal education requirements for practicing attorneys and three (3) of the hours completed in satisfying the continuing legal education requirements are training or continuing education courses required by subdivision (a)(1), then the judge shall not be required to complete three (3) additional hours of training or continuing education courses required by subdivision (a)(1). By March 1 following the year for which the requirements are met, the judge shall submit to the administrative office of the courts a copy of the statement of compliance issued by the commission on continuing legal education verifying the number of continuing legal education hours completed for such year.

Each calendar year, the clerk of each municipal court must attend at least three (3) hours of training or continuing education courses provided by, through or with approval of the AOC and must certify attendance to the administrative director; provided, however, that such attendance requirements do not apply to any municipal clerk who is required to be certified pursuant to § 6-54-120.

Each municipal court clerk shall be compensated and reimbursed for attending required training and continuing education in accordance with the travel policy of the municipality.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2; 2006, ch. 1004, §§ 3, 4; 2009, ch. 505, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added “Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a)(4),” to the beginning of the first sentence of (a)(1); and added (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 505, § 4. June 25, 2009.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of education requirement for city judges under T.C.A.§ 16-18-309(a)(1), OAG 05-127 (8/22/05).

16-18-310. Clerk of the municipal court.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, at all times there shall be a person elected, appointed or otherwise designated to serve as clerk of the municipal court. Immediately upon each such election, appointment or designation, the chief administrative officer of the municipality shall promptly certify the results of the election, appointment or designation to the administrative office of the courts and shall supply such additional information concerning the clerk as required by the administrative director.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the clerk of the municipal court shall maintain an accurate and detailed record and summary report of all financial transactions and affairs of the court. The record and report shall accurately reflect all disposed cases, assessments, collections, suspensions, waivers and transmittals of litigation taxes, court costs, forfeitures, fines, fees and any other receipts and disbursements. An audit of the financial records and transactions of the municipal court shall be made each year as part of any audit performed pursuant to § 6-56-101 or § 6-56-105.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Attorney General Opinions. The method by which the city court clerk must be chosen depends on the statute or private act under which that court was created, OAG 08-183 (12/11/08).

16-18-311. Compliance with the procedures and requirements for concurrent general sessions jurisdiction — Feasibility study committee to determine need of additional court to exercise general sessions jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on or after May 12, 2003, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall be newly conferred upon an existing or newly created municipal court only in compliance with the procedures and requirements set forth in this section.

A majority of the total membership of the municipal legislative body must vote in favor of seeking concurrent general sessions jurisdiction for an existing or newly created municipal court.

The municipal legislative body must notify, by petition, the county legislative body of the municipality's intention to seek concurrent general sessions jurisdiction for the municipal court.

The petition must contain the following:

A plan for an adequate and secure courtroom;

Agreement to comply with state mandated technical computer support comparable with the Tennessee court information system (TnCIS) program specifications and requirements;

Agreement to comply with state laws governing general sessions court litigation taxes, costs, fees and assessments and to legally remit such items to the state department of revenue or to the county government, if appropriate; and

Agreement to comply with state laws subjecting the financial transactions of the court to annual public audits.

The municipal legislative body and the county legislative body must appoint a feasibility study committee. The membership of the committee shall consist of the county mayor, the municipal mayor, one (1) member of the municipal legislative body, one (1) member of the county legislative body, the district attorney general who serves the county and the district public defender who serves the county. The membership of the committee shall also consist of three (3) members appointed by the municipal legislative body from the following list: the chief of police, the city recorder/clerk, the city judge, the city attorney, and one (1) citizen member. The membership of the committee shall also consist of three (3) members appointed by the county legislative body from the following list: the sheriff who serves the county, a general sessions judge who serves the county, the general sessions court clerk, the county attorney, and one (1) citizen member.

The feasibility study committee shall determine whether the county requires an additional court to exercise general sessions jurisdiction. In making the determination, the committee shall consider and evaluate the following factors:

The economic, administrative and personnel impact of the proposal upon the existing general sessions court;

The impact of the proposal upon existing judicial services and law enforcement resources;

The extent, if any, to which the proposed plan is necessary to promote and ensure the efficient administration of justice in relation to county and municipal populations, county population density, geographic logistics and distances, caseloads, the number of judges, and the current caseload burden on the existing system;

The plan's provision of adequate secure and comparable courtroom facilities for the hearing of cases in that location;

The extent, if any, to which the proposed plan would unduly burden the existing staffs of the district attorney general or district public defender and the extent, if any, to which the plan proposes adequate funding for additional staff requirements; and

The extent, if any, to which the proposed plan would provide for compliance with state mandated technical computer support.

By majority vote of its total membership, the feasibility study committee must agree upon written findings and recommendations and must submit the findings and recommendations to the municipal legislative body and to the county legislative body. The findings and recommendations must include one of the following alternatives:

There is a clearly demonstrated need for a new general sessions court in the county, and the court would best be administered by the county;

There is a clearly demonstrated need for a new general sessions court in the county, and the court would best be administered by the municipality, either as a new or existing municipal court with concurrent general sessions jurisdiction; or

There is no clearly demonstrated need, at the time, for any of the alternatives set forth in subdivisions (a)(6)(A) and (B).

If the feasibility study committee determines that there is no clearly demonstrated need for any of the alternatives set forth in subdivisions (a)(6)(A) and (B), then for one (1) year thereafter, neither the county nor the municipality may pursue further implementation of any of the alternatives set forth in subdivision (a)(6)(A) or (a)(6)(B). After passage of one (1) year, if the majority of the total membership of the municipal legislative body again votes in favor of seeking concurrent general sessions jurisdiction for an existing or newly created municipal court, then a petition must again be submitted to the county legislative body and the procedures set forth in this section must again be followed.

If the feasibility study committee recommends any one (1) of the findings set forth in subdivision (a)(6)(A) or (a)(6)(B), and if the county wishes to pursue creation of a new general sessions court in the county or if the municipality wishes to pursue extension of concurrent general sessions jurisdiction to a newly created or existing municipal court, then the county or municipality, as appropriate, shall:

Submit the written findings and recommendations of the feasibility study committee to the judiciary committee of the senate and the judiciary committee of the house of representatives; and

Cause legislation to be timely introduced for consideration by the general assembly.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any legislation proposed to create a new general sessions court or to create a new municipal court with concurrent general sessions jurisdiction or to confer concurrent general sessions jurisdiction on an existing municipal court must be approved by a majority of the total membership of the judiciary committee of the senate prior to passage by the senate and must be approved by a majority of the total membership of the judiciary committee of the house of representatives prior to passage by the house of representatives.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if a municipality is located in two (2) or more counties of this state, then, as used in this section, “county” means the county of this state containing the largest geographical portion of the municipality.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 32; 2019, ch. 345, § 22; 2019, ch. 420, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, § 16-18-301 (Acts 1999, ch. 149, § 1), concerning administration of oaths by municipal court judges, was repealed and replaced by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 2, effective March 1, 2005.

Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former§ 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” for “the judiciary committee of the house of representatives” in (a)(8)(A) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “judiciary” for “civil justice” preceding “committee of the house” in (a)(8)(A) and (b).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 420 rewrote former (a)(8), which read: “If the feasibility study committee recommends any one (1) of the findings set forth in subdivision (a)(6)(A) or (a)(6)(B), and if the county wishes to pursue creation of a new general sessions court in the county or if the municipality wishes to pursue extension of concurrent general sessions jurisdiction to a newly created or existing municipal court, then the county or municipality, as appropriate, shall: “(A) Submit the written findings and recommendations of the feasibility study committee to the judiciary committee of the senate, the civil justice committee of the house of representatives and the judicial council;“(B) Cause legislation to be timely prepared and submitted for review and evaluation by the judicial council in accordance with procedures set forth in § 16-21-107(a)(3) for a judicial district seeking creation of a state trial court; and”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. Failure to comply with T.C.A. § 16-18-311(b) would not affect the validity of a private act creating new part of a county general sessions court so long as it was adopted in compliance with constitutional requirements, OAG 06-087 (5/11/06).

16-18-312. Substituted judges — Sitting by interchange for other judges.

If a municipal judge is unable to preside over municipal court for any reason, then a special substitute municipal judge shall be determined pursuant to an ordinance of the governing body of such municipal court. In the absence of such an ordinance, then the municipal judge may designate in writing, to be filed with the clerk of the municipal court, the name of a special substitute judge to hold court in the municipal judge's place and stead. The special substitute judge must meet the qualifications of a municipal judge and the special substitute judge shall take the same oath and have the same authority as the regular municipal judge to hold court for the occasion. Such appointment of a special substitute judge is effective for no more than thirty (30) days, after which a new appointment is required.

Municipal court judges and general sessions court judges are empowered to sit by interchange for other municipal court judges.

Acts 2006, ch. 1004, § 5; 2019, ch. 72, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 72, § 2. July 1, 2019.